Alaska, session 34, SB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 04 to read: 05 REPORT OF THE SUPERIOR COURT REGARDING INVOLUNTARY 06 COMMITMENT. By December 31, 2026, the superior court shall transmit the information 07 under AS 47.30.907(a) that has not been previously reported to the Department of Public 08 Safety for all orders of the superior court issued for the involuntary commitment of a person 09 under AS 47.30.735 - 47.30.755 or for orders of relief from a disability resulting from an 10 involuntary commitment or an adjudication of mental illness or mental incompetence granted 11 under AS 47.30.851(b). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.